Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1120.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-434.03, to read: START_STATUTE36-434.03. Radiation protection systems; installation requirement; definitions A. On or before July 1, 2027, each hospital that performs cardiac catheterization procedures involving real-time x-ray imaging shall ensure that at least fifty percent of the procedure rooms in which these procedures occur are equipped with a radiation protection system. B. A hospital that issues a purchase order for radiation protection systems for at least fifty percent of the applicable procedure rooms on or before July 1, 2027 and that installs those radiation protection systems not later than December 31, 2027 satisfies the requirement prescribed in subsection A of this section. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Purchase order" means a binding document that is issued by a hospital requesting a vendor to deliver the described equipment at a specific price and that obligates the hospital to pay the vendor on delivery and acceptance of the equipment or in accordance with the terms of the purchase order. 2. "radiation protection system" means a shielding system that is designed to protect against scatter or direct ionizing radiation exposure, that provides protection equal to or greater than the shielding effectiveness of a .25 millimeter lead-equivalent apron and that includes real-time dosimetry to measure radiation exposure to health professionals throughout an ionizing radiation medical procedure. END_STATUTE